Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.155.240

Noncompliance—Complaint process—Major program changes—Corrective action.

(1) On its webpage related to special education, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must develop and publish a complaint process for individuals to report noncompliance with local, state, or federal laws or violation of students rights by authorized entities. The webpage may include additional instructions for submitting complaints to the resident school district and for using the special education community complaint processes, when applicable.

(2) When an authorized entity notifies the office of the superintendent of public instruction about major program changes, the office shall review the changes with affected school districts to determine whether the entity remains authorized to provide contracted services.

(3) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must monitor and investigate authorized entities and contracting school districts to ensure compliance with the requirements of RCW 28A.155.060 and 28A.300.690. In completing this duty, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must use information and data gathered during on-site visits, submitted through the complaint processes, and provided by authorized entities and school districts. The office of the superintendent of public instruction must use this process to identify and address patterns of misconduct, including issuing corrective action or revoking an entity's authorization under RCW 28A.300.690 to contract with school districts.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the authorization of an entity under RCW 28A.300.690 if the entity:

(a) Fails to maintain authorization standards under RCW 28A.300.690;

(b) Violates the rights of students placed in the authorized entity by a school district;

(c) Fails to adhere to applicable local, state, and federal laws, including health, safety, and civil rights laws;

(d) Fails to comply with contract requirements under RCW 28A.155.060; or

(e) Refuses to implement any corrective actions ordered by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(5) As used in this section, "authorized entity" and "entity" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.300.690.

[ 2023 c 436 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 436: See note following RCW 28A.300.690.